Virginia statutes. Title 24.2. Elections.
Article 3. Candidates and Their Campaign Committees.

§ 24.2-947.
Candidate election cycle.

The candidate’s election cycle shall be deemed to begin on January 1 of the year that the candidate first seeks election for the office through December 31 immediately following the election for such office. The next election cycle, and any subsequent election cycles, for the candidate who seeks election for successive terms in the same office shall begin on January 1 immediately following each election for the same office and continue through December 31 immediately following the next successive election for the same office. Solely for the purpose of filing reports pursuant to this article, a candidate with any activity to report in a new election cycle shall be presumed to be a candidate for election in the succeeding election.

History.

1970, c. 462, § 24.1-256; 1975, c. 515; 1990, c. 976; 1993, c. 641, § 24.2-906; 2003, c. 248; 2006, cc. 787, 892.

Law Review.

For 2007 annual survey article, “Civil Practice and Procedure,” see 42 U. Rich. L. Rev. 229 (2007).

OPINIONS OF THE ATTORNEY GENERAL

Political booths. —

An absolute prohibition on political booths is not constitutionally permissible and charging a higher fee for such booths than that charged other participating individuals or organizations is presumptively unconstitutional unless justified by a compelling governmental interest, and unless it is narrowly drawn to meet that interest. See opinion of Attorney General to The Honorable Richard L. Morris, Member, House of Delegates, No. 14-064, 2014 Va. AG LEXIS 67 (12/18/14).

§ 24.2-947.1.
Statement of organization.

Any individual seeking or campaigning for an office of the Commonwealth or one of its governmental units in a party nomination process or general, primary, or special election shall file a statement of organization within 10 days of meeting any one of the following conditions:

Acceptance of a contribution;

Expenditure of any funds;

The payment of a filing fee for any party nomination method;

The filing of a candidate statement of qualification pursuant to §

24.2-501

;

The appointment of a campaign treasurer, designation of a campaign committee, or designation of a campaign depository; or

In the case of a candidate for a town office in a town with a population of less than 25,000 that has not otherwise adopted the provisions of this chapter by ordinance, acceptance of a contribution or expenditure of funds that brings the total amount of contributions accepted or funds expended to more than $25,000 within the candidate’s election cycle, as set forth in §

24.2-947

.

Candidates for statewide office shall file the statement with the State Board. Candidates for the General Assembly shall file the statement with the State Board and a copy of the statement with the general registrar of the locality of the candidate’s residence. Candidates for local or constitutional office shall file the statement with the general registrar and, if the statement indicates that the candidate committee will be filing electronically, a copy with the State Board.

The statement of organization shall include the following information:

The full name and residence address of the candidate;

The full name and mailing address for the campaign committee;

The full name, residence address, and daytime phone number of the treasurer;

The office being sought and district, if any, for the office;

The recognized political party affiliation of the candidate for statewide office or the General Assembly. In the absence of any political party affiliation, independent shall be used;

The name of the financial institution for his campaign depository; and

Such other information as shall be required by the State Board except that the account number for a designated depository account shall not be required.

In the case of any candidate who seeks election for successive terms in the same office, the statement of organization filed by the candidate shall continue in effect for such successive elections, but the candidate shall file notice of any changes in the information provided on the form within 10 days of the change with the State Board, general registrar, or both, as appropriate.

History.

1970, c. 462, §§ 24.1-253, 24.1-254; 1971, Ex. Sess., c. 222; 1972, cc. 620, 622; 1975, c. 515; 1978, c. 778; 1983, c. 119; 1984, c. 480; 1993, c. 641, § 24.2-904; 1996, c. 405; 2003, c. 248; 2004, cc. 441, 480; 2006, cc. 787, 892; 2007, cc. 151, 286; 2015, cc. 644, 645; 2019, c. 825.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2006, c. 134, amended former § 24.2-904, from which this section is derived. The language added was substantially included in §§

24.2-947.1

and

24.2-947.5

as enacted by Acts 2006, cc. 787 and 892.

Acts 2007, cc. 151 and 286, cl. 2 provides: “That the provisions of this act shall not become effective unless the funds necessary to implement its provisions are appropriated or adequate programming is made available for a centralized system to accept reports pertaining to local offices.” The funding was appropriated. See Acts 2006, Sp. Sess. I, c. 3, Item 86 D, as added by Acts 2007, c. 847.

The 2007 amendments.

The 2007 amendment by cc. 151 and 286 are identical, and rewrote subsection B.

The 2015 amendments.

The 2015 amendments by cc. 644 and 645 are identical, and in subsection B, substituted “general registrar of the locality” for “local electoral board” and “general registrar” for “local electoral board”; and substituted “general registrar” for “local electoral board” in subsection D.

The 2019 amendments.

The 2019 amendment by c. 825 added subdivision A 6; and made stylistic changes.

OPINIONS OF THE ATTORNEY GENERAL

Campaign fundraising. —

Section

24.2-954

precludes members of the General Assembly from engaging in fundraising activity in connection with a campaign for state office during a regular session of the General Assembly. However, that prohibition does not restrict fundraising activity related to a campaign for federal office. See opinion of Attorney General to The Honorable Robert Hurt, Member, Senate of Virginia, 10-005, 2010 Va. AG LEXIS 4 (1/25/10).

§ 24.2-947.2.
Campaign depositories; reimbursements of expenses; petty cash fund.

Upon meeting any of the requirements of subsection A of §

24.2-947.1

, the candidate shall designate a campaign depository, which shall be maintained in a financial institution within the Commonwealth, in an account properly identifying the name of and the existence of the political candidacy.

No candidate, campaign treasurer, or other individual shall pay any expense on behalf of a candidate, directly or indirectly, except by a check or electronic debit drawn on such designated depository identifying the name of the campaign committee and candidate. However, a candidate, treasurer, or other authorized member of the candidate’s campaign staff may be reimbursed, by a check or electronic debit drawn on the designated depository, or according to the provisions of subsection C, for the payment of expenses (i) paid by him by cash, check or electronic debit, or credit card, (ii) made on behalf of the campaign, and (iii) fully documented by complete records of the expenditure, maintained as required by this chapter, and including receipts identifying the nature of the expenses and the names and addresses of each person paid by the recipient of the reimbursement.

A campaign committee (i) may establish a petty cash fund to be utilized for the purpose of making expenditures or reimbursing verified credit card expenditures of less than $200 if complete records of such expenditures are maintained as required by this chapter and (ii) may transfer funds from the designated campaign depository to an account or instrument to earn interest on the funds so long as the transferred funds and earned interest are returned to the designated depository account, complete records are maintained, and all expenditures are made through the designated depository account.

Notwithstanding the provisions of this section pertaining to campaign committee depositories and accounts, the campaign committee’s treasurer may establish a separate federal compliance account in the candidate’s designated campaign depository for the purpose of complying with requirements of federal law including, without limitation, restrictions on sources and amounts of campaign contributions applicable to federal candidates and officeholders. The candidate and campaign treasurer shall report all contributions and expenditures for an account established pursuant to this subsection on a consolidated basis with the candidate’s campaign account established pursuant to this section in disclosure reports filed pursuant to this article. In addition, the treasurer may transfer funds from a federal compliance account created pursuant to this subsection to an account or instrument to earn interest on the funds so long as the transferred funds and earned interest are returned to the designated depository account created pursuant to subsection A, complete records are maintained, and all expenditures are made through the designated depository account.
D. 1. Notwithstanding the provisions of this section pertaining to campaign committee depositories and accounts, the campaign committee’s treasurer may establish a separate federal compliance account in the candidate’s designated campaign depository for the purpose of complying with requirements of federal law including, without limitation, restrictions on sources and amounts of campaign contributions applicable to federal candidates and officeholders. The candidate and campaign treasurer shall report all contributions and expenditures for an account established pursuant to this subsection on a consolidated basis with the candidate’s campaign account established pursuant to this section in disclosure reports filed pursuant to this article. In addition, the treasurer may transfer funds from a federal compliance account created pursuant to this subsection to an account or instrument to earn interest on the funds so long as the transferred funds and earned interest are returned to the designated depository account created pursuant to subsection A, complete records are maintained, and all expenditures are made through the designated depository account.

A committee registered with the Federal Election Commission which is not otherwise required by this chapter to file with the State Board, shall not be deemed to have triggered such filing requirements solely by virtue of one or more contributions to one or more federal compliance accounts created pursuant to this subsection.

History.

1970, c. 462, §§ 24.1-253, 24.1-254; 1971, Ex. Sess., c. 222; 1972, cc. 620, 622; 1975, c. 515; 1978, c. 778; 1983, c. 119; 1984, c. 480; 1993, c. 641, §§ 24.2-904, 24.2-905; 1996, cc. 217, 405; 2000, c. 326; 2001, c. 633; 2002, cc. 213, 232; 2003, cc. 248, 967, § 24.2-905.1; 2004, cc. 441, 457, 480; 2006, cc. 787, 892; 2020, c. 349.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2006, cc. 773 and 799 amended former § 24.2-905, from which this section is derived. The changes were included in §

24.2-947.2

as enacted by Acts 2006, cc. 787 and 892.

The 2020 amendments.

The 2020 amendment by c. 349, in subsection B, inserted “or electronic debit” in the first sentence and in the introductory wording of the second sentence and substituted “cash, check or electronic debit, or credit card” for “check, cash, or credit or debit card” in clause (i); and made stylistic changes.

§ 24.2-947.3.
Campaign committee treasurer requirements and responsibilities.

Upon meeting any of the requirements of subsection A of §

24.2-947.1

, the candidate shall appoint a single campaign treasurer who shall be a registered voter in Virginia. Every treasurer so appointed shall accept the appointment, in writing on the statement of organization, prior to the filing thereof. No individual shall act as treasurer unless the required statement of appointment has been filed. The same person may serve as campaign treasurer for more than one candidate.

In the event of the death, resignation, removal, or change of the treasurer, the candidate shall designate a successor and file the name and address of the successor within 10 days of the change with the State Board, general registrar, or both, as provided in subsection B of §

24.2-947.1

.

Any candidate who fails to appoint a treasurer or successor treasurer shall be deemed to have appointed himself treasurer and shall comply as such with the provisions of this chapter.

All contributions and expenditures received or made by any candidate, or received or made on his behalf or in relation to his candidacy by any person, except independent expenditures, shall be paid over or delivered to the candidate’s treasurer or shall be reported to the treasurer in such detail and form as to allow him to comply fully with this chapter. An independent expenditure shall be reported pursuant to §

24.2-945.2

in lieu of being reported to the candidate’s treasurer.

The candidate or his treasurer shall keep detailed and accurate accounts of all contributions turned over to and expenditures made by the candidate or his treasurer on behalf of the candidate or his campaign committee, or reported to any candidate or his treasurer pursuant to this article. Such account shall set forth the date of the contribution or expenditure, its amount or value, the name and address of the person or committee making the contribution or to whom the expenditure was made, and the object or purpose of the contribution or expenditure. Such books and records may be destroyed or discarded at any time after (i) one year from the date of filing the final report required by §

24.2-948.4

or (ii) three years after the December 31 immediately following the election, whichever last occurs, unless a court of competent jurisdiction shall order their retention for a longer period.

The treasurer shall be responsible for retaining all bank statements for, and copies of checks issued on, the campaign depository and bills, invoices, and receipts for any expenditure greater than $500. The treasurer for a nonincumbent candidate shall retain such records and materials for a period starting from the date of the designation of the campaign depository for the campaign through July 1 of the year immediately following the year of the election. The treasurer for incumbent candidates shall retain such records and materials for a period starting from the date that the incumbent was sworn into office for the term being served at the time of the election through July 1 of the year immediately following the year of the election. The treasurer shall make such records and materials available to the Department or its designee upon request pursuant to the provisions of §

24.2-948.5

.

It shall be unlawful for any candidate, his treasurer, or any person receiving contributions or making expenditures on a candidate’s behalf or in relation to his candidacy, to fail to report every contribution and expenditure as required by this article.

History.

1970, c. 462, §§ 24.1-253, 24.1-254, 24.1-255, 24.2-256; 1971, Ex. Sess., c. 222; 1972, cc. 620, 622; 1975, c. 515; 1978, c. 778; 1981, c. 425; 1983, c. 119; 1984, c. 480; 1988, c. 616; 1990, c. 976; 1991, c. 9; 1993, cc. 641, 776, 921, §§ 24.2-904, 24.2-906, 24.2-907; 1996, c. 405; 2003, c. 248; 2004, cc. 441, 480; 2006, cc. 787, 892; 2015, cc. 644, 645; 2022, c. 258.

Editor's note.

Acts 2022, c. 258, cl. 2 provides: “That campaign finance reports filed prior to January 1, 2024, shall not be subject to the provisions of this act, and the provisions of this act shall not be effective until January 1, 2024.”

The 2015 amendments.

The 2015 amendments by cc. 644 and 645 are identical and substituted “general registrar” for “local electoral board” in subsection B.

The 2022 amendments.

The 2022 amendment by c. 258, effective July 1, 2024, redesignated former subsection F as current subsection G; and added subsection F.

§ 24.2-947.3:1.
Certain contributions received from federal political action and out-of-state political committees; campaign committee responsibilities.

Prior to accepting contributions of $10,000 or more in the aggregate in any calendar year from any one federal political action committee or out-of-state political committee, the candidate campaign committee shall (i) request the federal political action committee’s or out-of-state political committee’s State Board of Elections registration number from the committee and (ii) verify that number with the State Board.

History.

2006, cc. 771, 805, § 24.2-907.1.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2006, cc. 771 and 805 enacted § 24.2-907.1, from which this section is derived. Pursuant to § 30-152, Acts 2006, cc. 771 and 805 have been given effect in this section as set out above.

Law Review.

For 2007 annual survey article, “Civil Practice and Procedure,” see 42 U. Rich. L. Rev. 229 (2007).

§ 24.2-947.4.
Information to be included on campaign finance reports for campaign committees.

The reports required by this article shall be filed on a form prescribed by the State Board and shall include all financial activity of the campaign committee. All completed forms shall be submitted in typed, printed, or legibly hand printed format or electronically as provided in §

24.2-946.1

. Persons submitting the forms shall do so subject to felony penalties for making false statements pursuant to §

24.2-1016

.

The report of receipts shall include:

The total number of contributors, each of whom has contributed an aggregate of $100 or less, including cash and in-kind contributions, as of the date of the report, and the total amount of contributions from all such contributors;

For each contributor who has contributed an aggregate of more than $100, including cash and in-kind contributions, as of the ending date of the report, the campaign committee shall itemize each contributor on the report and list the following information:

the name of the contributor, listed alphabetically,

the mailing address of the contributor,

the amount of the contribution,

the aggregate amount of contributions from the contributor to date,

the date of the contribution,

the occupation of the contributor,

the name of his employer or principal business, and

the city and state where employed or where his business is located.For each such contributor, other than an individual, the principal type of business and place of business of the contributor shall be substituted for subdivisions f and g, respectively. For each such contributor other than an individual, it shall be sufficient to list the address of the contributor one time on the report of receipts.

The report of disbursements shall include all expenditures and give:

The name and address of the person paid;

A brief description of the purpose of the expenditure;

The name of the person contracting for or arranging the expenditure;

The amount of the expenditure; and

The date of the expenditure.The report of disbursements shall itemize any expenditure made by credit card payment.

Each report for a candidate shall list separately those receipts and expenditures reported to the candidate or his treasurer by any person, campaign committee, or political committee pursuant to subsection D of §

24.2-947.3

, and in the case of in-kind contributions, shall set forth in each instance the source of the information reported.

The report shall list separately all loans and, for each loan, shall give:

The date the loan was made;

The name and address of the person making the loan and any person who is a co-borrower, guarantor, or endorser of the loan;

The amount of the loan;

The date and amount of any repayment of the loan; and

For any loan or part of a loan that is forgiven by the lender, the amount forgiven listed as both a contribution and loan repayment.

The State Board shall provide for a “no activity” report that may be filed for any reporting period in which the filer has no activity to report.

It is the joint responsibility of the candidate and his treasurer that the report of a candidate be filed, that the report be in full and accurate detail, and that the report be received by the State Board, general registrar, or both, by the deadline for filing the report.

3.

For each designated contribution received by the campaign committee from a political committee, out-of-state political committee, or federal political action committee, the campaign committee shall list the name of the person who designated the contribution and provide the information required by this subsection.

History.

1970, c. 462, § 24.1-258; 1971, Ex. Sess., c. 247; 1972, c. 620; 1975, c. 515; 1976, c. 616; 1978, c. 381; 1983, c. 119; 1990, c. 156; 1993, cc. 341, 641, § 24.2-914; 1997, cc. 364, 392; 1999, c. 864; 2000, c. 304; 2001, cc. 618, 810; 2002, c. 468; 2003, c. 248; 2006, cc. 787, 892; 2008, cc. 152, 289; 2015, cc. 644, 645.

The 2008 amendments.

The 2008 amendments by cc. 152 and 289, effective January 1, 2009, are identical, and added subdivision B 3.

The 2015 amendments.

The 2015 amendments by cc. 644 and 645 are identical and substituted “general registrar” for “local electoral board” in subsection G.

Law Review.

For 2007 annual survey article, “Civil Practice and Procedure,” see 42 U. Rich. L. Rev. 229 (2007).

§ 24.2-947.4:1.
Loans to candidate campaign committees; prohibited interest payments; civil penalty.

This section shall apply to any loan made to a candidate campaign committee by the candidate or by a member of his immediate family as that term is defined in § 30-101. There shall be no interest paid to the candidate or his immediate family member by the candidate campaign committee on the amount of the loan, and the committee shall repay no more than the face value of the loan.

Any person who accepts or makes an interest payment in violation of this section shall be subject to a civil penalty equal to the amount of the prohibited interest payment or $500, whichever amount is greater. The attorney for the Commonwealth shall initiate civil proceedings to enforce the civil penalty provided herein. Any civil penalties collected shall be payable to the State Treasurer for deposit to the general fund.

History.

2012, c. 163.

§ 24.2-947.5.
With whom candidates file reports; electronic filing requirement.

Candidates for statewide office and for the General Assembly shall file the reports required by this article by computer or electronic means in accordance with the standards approved by the State Board.

Candidates for local or constitutional office in any locality shall file reports required by this article with the State Board by computer or electronic means in accordance with the standards approved by the State Board and shall not be required to file reports with the general registrar of the locality in which the candidate resides.

Except as provided in §

24.2-948.1

, candidates for any other office who file reports in nonelectronic format shall file with the general registrar of the locality in which the candidate resides.

Notwithstanding the provisions of subsection C, a former candidate who is no longer seeking election but has not yet filed a final report as required by §

24.2-948.4

and who files reports in nonelectronic format shall file with the general registrar of the locality in which he sought office.

Any report that may be filed with the State Board by mail shall be (i) received by the State Board by the deadline for filing the report or (ii) transmitted to the State Board by telephonic transmission to a facsimile device by the deadline for filing the report with an original copy of the report mailed to the State Board and postmarked by the deadline for filing the report.

History.

1970, c. 462, §§ 24.1-253, 24.1-254; 1971, Ex. Sess., c. 222; 1972, cc. 620, 622; 1975, c. 515; 1978, c. 778; 1983, c. 119; 1984, c. 480; 1986, c. 558, § 24.1-257.2; 1988, c. 734; 1991, c. 709; 1993, c. 641, §§ 24.2-904, 24.2-915; 1996, c. 405; 2000, cc. 304, 511, 555; 2001, cc. 618, 794, 810; 2002, c. 468; 2003, c. 248; 2004, cc. 441, 480; 2006, cc. 787, 892; 2007, cc. 151, 286; 2015, cc. 644, 645; 2018, cc. 538, 683; 2020, c. 769.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2006, c. 134, amended former § 24.2-904, from which this section is derived. The language added was substantially included in §§

24.2-947.1

and

24.2-947.5

as enacted by Acts 2006, cc. 787 and 892.

Acts 2007, cc. 151 and 286, cl. 2 provides: “That the provisions of this act shall not become effective unless the funds necessary to implement its provisions are appropriated or adequate programming is made available for a centralized system to accept reports pertaining to local offices.” The funding was appropriated. See Acts 2006, Sp. Sess. I, c. 3, Item 86 D, as added by Acts 2007, c. 847.

Acts 2020, c. 769, cl. 2 provides: “That the provisions of this act shall become effective on January 1, 2021.”

Acts 2020, c. 1289, as amended by Acts 2021, Sp. Sess. I, c. 552, Item 86 D, effective for the biennium ending June 30, 2022, provides: “The State Board of Elections shall by regulation provide for an administrative fee up to $25 for each non-electronic report filed with the State Board under §

24.2-947.5

. The regulation shall provide for waiver of the fee based upon indigence.”

The 2007 amendments.

The 2007 amendment by cc. 151 and 286 are identical, and rewrote subsection C.

The 2015 amendments.

The 2015 amendments by cc. 644 and 645 are identical and substituted “general registrar” for “electoral board” throughout the section.

The 2018 amendments.

The 2018 amendment by c. 538, in subsection A, inserted “and for the General Assembly”; in subsection B, substituted “local or constitutional office in any locality with a population of more than 70,000 shall” for “the General Assembly may” in the first sentence, deleted the former second sentence, which read “Nonelectronic reports for the General Assembly shall be filed with the State Board and with the general registrar of the locality where the candidate resides”; and rewrote and transferred the former last two sentences in subsection C to the end of subsection B.

The 2018 amendment by c. 683, in subsection C, deleted “Beginning July 1, 2007” at the beginning of the former second sentence; inserted subsection D and made related changes.

The 2020 amendments.

The 2020 amendment by c. 769, effective January 1, 2021, in subsection B, deleted “with a population of more than 70,000” following “in any locality” and substituted “approved by the State Board and shall not be required to file reports” for “approved by the State Board. All other candidates for local or constitutional office may file reports required by this article with the State Board by computer or electronic means in accordance with the standards approved by the State Board. Candidates who file by electronic means with the State Board are not required to file reports”; and in subsection D, substituted “subsection C” for “subsection B or C.”

Law Review.

For article, “Election Law,” see 35 U. Rich. L. Rev. 575 (2001).

§ 24.2-947.6.
Filing schedule for candidates for office; November elections.

Any candidate for any office to be filled at a November general election shall file the prescribed campaign finance reports as follows:

Not later than July 15 in a nonelection year for the period January 1 through June 30;

Not later than January 15 following a nonelection year for the period July 1 through December 31;

In an election year, not later than April 15 for the period January 1 through March 31 and pursuant to subdivisions 4 through 9 of this section;

Not later than the eighth day before the primary date complete through the twelfth day before the primary date;

Not later than July 15 complete through June 30;

Not later than September 15 complete through August 31;

Not later than October 15 complete through September 30;

Not later than the eighth day before the November election date complete through the twelfth day before the election date;

Not later than the thirtieth day after the November election date complete through the twenty-third day after the election date; and

Not later than January 15 following an election year complete through December 31, and then in accordance with subdivisions A 1 and A 2 or subdivisions A 3 through A 9, as appropriate, of this subsection until a final report is filed.

Any candidate, who was subject to the election year filing schedule set out in subdivisions A 3 through A 9 and who has not filed a final report, shall file reports in any subsequent election year for the same office in accordance with the election year filing schedule set out in subdivisions A 3 through A 9.

Any candidate shall also file any report of certain large contributions required by §

24.2-947.9

, if applicable.

History.

1986, c. 558, § 24.1-257.2; 1988, c. 734; 1991, c. 709; 1993, cc. 639, 641, § 24.2-916; 1995, c. 785; 2004, c. 26; 2006, cc. 787, 892; 2010, c. 696; 2015, c. 646.

Editor’s note.

At the direction of the Virginia Code Commission, “filled” was substituted for “filed” in the first sentence in subsection A.

The 2010 amendments.

The 2010 amendment by c. 696, deleted “or

24.2-948

” following “§

24.2-947.9

” in subsection C, and made minor stylistic changes.

The 2015 amendments.

The 2015 amendment by c. 646 substituted “twelfth day” for “thirteenth day” in subdivisions A 4 and A 8.

§ 24.2-947.7.
Filing schedule for candidates for office; May elections.

Any candidate for election to a local office to be filled at a May general election shall file the prescribed campaign finance reports as follows:

Not later than July 15 in a nonelection year for the period January 1 through June 30;

Not later than January 15 following a nonelection year for the period July 1 through December 31;

For municipal primary candidates only, not later than the eighth day before the primary date complete through the twelfth day before the primary;

Not later than April 15 of the election year complete through March 31;

Not later than the eighth day before the election date complete through the twelfth day before the election date;

Not later than June 15 of the election year complete through June 10;

Not later than July 15 of the election year complete through June 30; and

Not later than the following January 15 complete through December 31, and then in accordance with subdivisions A 1 and A 2 or subdivisions A 3 through A 7, as appropriate, of this subsection until a final report is filed.

Any candidate, who was subject to the election year filing schedule set out in subdivisions A 3 through A 8 and who has not filed a final report, shall file reports in any subsequent election year for the same office in accordance with the election year filing schedule set out in subdivisions A 3 through A 8.

Any candidate shall also file any report of certain large contributions required by §

24.2-947.9

, if applicable.

History.

1986, c. 558, § 24.1-257.2; 1988, c. 734; 1991, c. 709; 1993, c. 641, § 24.2-917; 1995, c. 785; 2004, c. 26; 2006, cc. 787, 892; 2008, c. 650; 2010, c. 696; 2015, c. 646.

The 2008 amendments.

The 2008 amendment by c. 650, effective March 21, 2008, added subdivisions A 1, A 2, and A 4 and redesignated subdivisions accordingly; in subdivision A 8, substituted “and then in accordance with subdivisions A 1 and A 2 or subdivisions A 3 through A 7, as appropriate, of this subsection” for “and semiannually thereafter, not later than July 15 complete through June 30 and not later than January 15 complete through December 31”; and in subsection B, substituted “A 8” for “A 5” twice and “A 3” for “A 1” twice.

The 2010 amendments.

The 2010 amendment by c. 696 deleted “or

24.2-948

” following “§

24.2-947.9

” in subsection C.

The 2015 amendments.

The 2015 amendment by c. 646 substituted “twelfth day” for “eleventh day” in subdivisions A 3 and A 5.

§ 24.2-947.8.
Filing requirements for special elections.

Candidates for nomination or election to an office to be filled by a special election held on a regular election date shall file the prescribed reports of contributions and expenditures which apply to regularly scheduled elections for that office.

In the case of a special election held on a date other than a regularly scheduled general election, the candidate shall file as follows:

A report not later than the eighth day before the special election date complete through the twelfth day before that date;

A postelection report no later than the thirtieth day after the election and prior to taking office; and

A postelection report not later than January 15 and July 15 each year until a final report is filed.

Any candidate, who has been subject to the election year filing schedule set out in subdivisions B 1 through B 3 and who has not filed a final report, shall file reports in any subsequent election year for the same office in accordance with the election year filing schedule set out in §

24.2-947.6

or

24.2-947.7

as appropriate for that office.

Any candidate shall also file any report of certain large contributions required by §

24.2-947.9

, if applicable.

History.

1986, c. 558, § 24.1-257.2; 1988, c. 734; 1991, c. 709; 1993, cc. 639, 641, § 24.2-918; 2005, c. 831; 2006, cc. 787, 892; 2010, c. 696; 2015, c. 646.

The 2010 amendments.

The 2010 amendment by c. 696 deleted “or

24.2-948

” following “§

24.2-947.9

” in subsection D.

The 2015 amendments.

The 2015 amendment by c. 646 substituted “twelfth day” for “eleventh day” in subdivision B 1.

§ 24.2-947.9.
Special report required of certain large pre-election contributions.

Any contribution reported pursuant to this section shall also be reported on the first report required by this article after any election.

Except as provided in subsection C, any single contribution of $5,000 or more for a statewide office, $1,000 or more for the General Assembly, or $500 or more for any other office, knowingly received or reported by the candidate or his treasurer on behalf of his candidacy on and after the eleventh day preceding (i) a primary and before the primary date, (ii) a general election and before the general election date, or (iii) any other election in which the individual is a candidate and before the election day, shall be reported in writing as provided in §§

24.2-947.4

and

24.2-947.5

or electronically pursuant to §

24.2-946.1

, and the report shall be received by the State Board or general registrar, as appropriate, by 11:59 p.m. on the following day or for a contribution received on a Saturday by 11:59 p.m. on the following Monday. However, any such contribution received within the 24 hours prior to the election day shall be reported and a report thereof received on the day prior to the election.

The reports required by subsection B of this section shall also be required of any candidate for nomination by a political party to serve as the party’s nominee in a general or special election if (i) the party nominates by convention or any method other than a primary and (ii) there are at least two candidates for nomination pursuant to the rules and procedures of the party. In such case, candidates for nomination shall be required to file the reports required by subsection B for the 11-day period, as specified by subsection B, immediately preceding:

The caucus, mass meeting, convention, or other nominating event at which the party’s nomination shall be finally determined pursuant to the rules and procedures of the party; and

Any caucus, mass meeting, convention, or other nominating event, other than that at which the party’s nomination shall be finally determined, at which delegates are chosen who are pledged to support a specified candidate on at least one ballot at a subsequent district or state convention required as part of the nominating process.

No report shall be required pursuant to subsection C if the candidate is or has become, by virtue of the withdrawal of any opponent or the operation of the rules and procedures of the party, unopposed for nomination at the time such report otherwise would be required to be made.

Any person who is named as the candidate on the statement of organization for more than one campaign committee required to file campaign finance reports under this article shall be required to file special reports pursuant to this section for all such committees during the period applicable to any such campaign committee.

History.

1986, c. 558, § 24.1-257.2; 1988, c. 734; 1991, c. 709; 1993, cc. 639, 641, § 24.2-919; 1995, c. 785; 1998, c. 382; 2000, c. 304; 2006, cc. 787, 892; 2007, cc. 151, 286; 2008, c. 380; 2015, cc. 644, 645, 646; 2016, c. 401; 2020, c. 347.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2007, cc. 151 and 286, cl. 2 provides: “That the provisions of this act shall not become effective unless the funds necessary to implement its provisions are appropriated or adequate programming is made available for a centralized system to accept reports pertaining to local offices.” The funding was appropriated.

The 2007 amendments.

The 2007 amendment by cc. 151 and 286 are identical, and deleted former subsection B and redesignated former subsections C through E as present subsections B through D.

The 2008 amendments.

The 2008 amendment by c. 380 substituted “§§

24.2-947.4

and

24.2-947.5

” for “§

24.2-947.4

” in subsection B.

The 2015 amendments.

The 2015 amendments by cc. 644 and 645 are identical and substituted “general registrar” for “local electoral board” following “State Board or” in subsection B.

The 2015 amendment by c. 646, in subsection B, substituted “on behalf of his candidacy on and after the eleventh day preceding (i) a primary” for “on behalf of his candidacy (i) on and after the twelfth day preceding a primary,” deleted “on and after the twelfth day preceding” following “(ii)” and deleted “on and after the eleventh day preceding” following “(iii)” in the first sentence; and deleted “12-day or” preceding “11-day” in subsection C.

The 2016 amendments.

The 2016 amendment by c. 401 substituted “11:59 p.m.” for “5:00 p.m.” twice in subsection B.

The 2020 amendments.

The 2020 amendment by c. 347 added subsection E.

§ 24.2-947.10.
Filing requirements for persons with multiple campaign committees.

Any person who is named as the candidate on the statement of organization for more than one campaign committee required to file campaign finance reports under this article shall have separate campaign finance reports filed for all such campaign committees by the deadline for filing campaign finance reports for any such campaign committee. Such campaign finance reports shall be complete through the period prescribed for the associated deadline.

History.

2020, c. 347.